Illinois, session 104th, SB523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Works Jobs Program Act is amended 5by changing Section 20-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 559/20-1)7    Sec. 20-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Illinois Works Jobs Program Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)